test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_NoExtra_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaaboozishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozensimishinaaniban
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waaboozensimishiwaaiban
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waaboozensimishiniiban
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozensimishini***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waaboozenhimishinaaniban
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waaboozenhimishiwaaiban
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waaboozenhimishiniiban
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozensimishinaanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozensimishinaanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozensimishinaaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waaboozensimishiwaaan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waaboozensimishiwaaag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waaboozensimishiwaaing
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waaboozensimishinian
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waaboozensimishiniag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waaboozensimishiniing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waaboozenhimishinaanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waaboozenhimishinaanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waaboozenhimishinaaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waaboozenhimishiwaaan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waaboozenhimishiwaaag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waaboozenhimishiwaaing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waaboozenhimishinian
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waaboozenhimishiniag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waaboozenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: waaboozensimishibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: waaboozensimishibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: waaboozensimishibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensimish***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensimish***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensimish***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhimishibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhimishibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhimishibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhimish***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensiminaanibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensiminaanibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensiminaanibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensimiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensimiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensimiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozensiminiibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozensiminiibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozensiminiibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensimini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensimini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensimini***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhiminaanibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhiminaanibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhiminaanibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhimiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhimiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhimiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhiminiibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhiminiibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhiminiibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhimini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensishinaanibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensishinaanibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensishinaanibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozensishiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozensishiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozensishiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozensishiniibanan
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozensishiniibanag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozensishiniibaning
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozensishini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozensishini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozensishini***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhishinaanibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhishinaanibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhishinaanibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhishiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhishiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhishiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozenhishiniibanan
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozenhishiniibanag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozenhishiniibaning
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozenhishini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waaboozimishinaanibanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waaboozimishinaanibanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waaboozimishinaanibaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waaboozimishiwaaibanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waaboozimishiwaaibanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waaboozimishiwaaibaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waaboozimishiniibanan
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waaboozimishiniibanag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waaboozimishiniibaning
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waaboozimishini***idig, idog***an
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waaboozimishini***idig, idog***ag
     waabooz+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waaboozimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niwaaboozensimishinaaniban
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niwaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niwaaboozensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niwaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niwaaboozensimishiniiban
     +Px1waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: niwaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niwaaboozenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niwaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niwaaboozenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niwaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niwaaboozenhimishiniiban
     +Px1waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: niwaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: giwaaboozensimishinaaniban
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giwaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: giwaaboozensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: giwaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: giwaaboozensimishiniiban
     +Px2waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: giwaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: giwaaboozenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giwaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: giwaaboozenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: giwaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: giwaaboozenhimishiniiban
     +Px2waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: giwaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: owaaboozensimishinaaniban
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: owaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: owaaboozensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: owaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: owaaboozensimishiniiban
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: owaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: owaaboozenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: owaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: owaaboozenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: owaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: owaaboozenhimishiniiban
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
